Maryland, session 2026, HB0728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Division II does not
apply to:
(1) procurement by:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0728*

HOUSE BILL 728
(xviii) the Department of Natural Resources, for:
1. negotiating or entering into grants, agreements, or
partnerships with nonprofit entities related to conservation service opportunities; and
2. negotiating or entering into pay–for–success contracts in
accordance with § 13–112.1 of this Division II; [and]
(xix) the State Archives for preservation, conservation, proper care,
restoration, and transportation of fine art or decorative art that is:
1. in the custody of the Commission on Artistic Property; and
2. owned by or loaned to the State; AND
(XX) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, THE DEPARTMENT
OF PLANNING, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR NEGOTIATING OR
ENTERING INTO AGREEMENTS OR PARTNERSHIPS WITH NONPROFIT ENTITIES FOR
PROJECTS RELATED TO HISTORIC PRESERVATION, ARCHAEOLOGY, OR
CONSERVATION SERVICE OPPORTUNITIES;
(b) (5) SECTION 13–218(F) OF THIS ARTICLE APPLIES TO A CONTRACT
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(XVIII)1 OR (XX) OF THIS SECTION.
13–218.
(F) A CONTRACT DESCRIBED UNDER § 11–203(A)(1)(XVIII)1 OR (XX) OF
THIS ARTICLE SHALL INCLUDE CLAUSES REQUIRING THE NONPROFIT ENTITY TO:
(1) COMPETITIVELY PROCURE ANY SUBCONTRACTED SERVICES IN A
TRANSPARENT MANNER IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE STATE LAW;
(2) PROVIDE ANNUAL REPORTS TO THE UNIT ON PARTNERSHIP
OUTCOMES AND EXPENDITURES; AND
(3) MAXIMIZE OPPORTUNITIES FOR COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT
RELATED TO THE HISTORIC PRESERVATION, ARCHAEOLOGY, OR CONSERVATION
SERVICE OPPORTUNITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.